Alaska, session 34, HB8.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF ALASKA: 03 * Section 1. AS 44.12.010 is amended by adding a new subsection to read: 04 (c) Notwithstanding the legal holidays established in (a)(13) and (14) of this 05 section, the legislature may not establish more than 12 legal holidays to be observed in 06 a calendar year. Welcome toThe Alaska State Legislature This web site is the place to track bills, locate and contact your legislators, and access committee information. Questions? Try our help wizard or call 907-465-4648. SMS Bill Tracking Text a bill number (ex: HB1) to 559-245-2529 to enroll in text alerts. You will receive an enrollment confirmation and instructions on how to stop receiving the alerts.